Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3660.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 14, Chapter 366, O.S.L.
2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 20N), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 20N. A. Upon the effective date of this act On or
after January 1, 2026, Class D1 shall include the following criminal
offenses:
1. Public warehouse and/or or commodity stock fraud, as
provided for in Section 9-34 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. False issuance of warehouse receipt, as provided for in
Section 9-35 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 2

3. Misrepresentation of charter, as provided for in Section 9-
36 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
4. Tampering with anhydrous equipment, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 11-10 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
5. Willfully burn forest, grass, crops, or woodlands, as
provided for in Section 16-25 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
6. Willful and unlawful burning of forest, grass, croplands,
rangeland, or other wild lands by owner, as provided for in Section
16-28.1 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
7. Possession of incendiary device with the intent to burn, as
provided for in Section 16-34 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
8. Operate aircraft not registered with the Federal Aviation
Administration Office of Aircraft Registry or foreign country, as
provided for in subsection A of Section 258 of Title 3 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
9. Supply false information in regard to aircraft ownership, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 258 of Title 3 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
10. Concealing identity of aircraft, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 258 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
11. Destruction of registration or serial number on aircraft,
as provided for in subsection A of Section 259 of Title 3 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
12. Destruction of registration or serial number on aircraft
with intent to conceal, as provided for in subsection B of Section
259 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
13. Sell, purchase, or possess aircraft with removed or
falsified identification number with intent to misrepresent the
identity of aircraft, as provided for in subsection D of Section 259
of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
14. Operating aircraft under the influence of alcohol, second
or subsequent offense within ten (10) years, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 301 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 3

15. Operating aircraft under the influence of intoxicant,
second or subsequent offense with ten (10) years, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 301 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
16. Unauthorized use of aircraft, as provided for in subsection
A of Section 321 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
17. Charge fee for horse race without a license, as provided
for in Section 205 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
18. Pari-mutuel wagering without a license, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 208.4 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
19. Entering racehorse under false name, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 208.6 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
20. Entering racehorse without name being registered, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 208.6 of Title 3A of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
21. Using racing stimulating devices, as provided for in
Section 208.7 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
22. Racetrack bribery or ticket falsification, as provided for
in Section 208.8 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
23. Unauthorized wagering on horse racing, as provided for in
Section 208.9 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
24. Falsification of information on racehorse, as provided for
in Section 208.10 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
25. Administer a drug or medication without authorization to
horse prior to racing, as provided for in subsection C of Section
208.11 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
26. Violation of horse racing drug provisions, as provided for
in subsection D of Section 208.11 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
27. Forging and/or or counterfeiting state lottery ticket, as
provided for in subsection A of Section 727 of Title 3A of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 4

28. Influence lottery win by fraud, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 727 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
29. Own dog that attacks and kills a person, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 42.4 of Title 4 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
30. Release dog on law enforcement officer, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 42.4 of Title 4 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
31. Pledging assets of bank as collateral, as provided in
Section 809 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
32. Unlawful compensation of bank officer, as provided for in
Section 1405 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
33. Receipt of deposits while insolvent, as provided for in
Section 1406 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
34. Unlawful service as bank officer or director, as provided
for in Section 1407 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
35. Serving as bank commissioner, administrative assistant, or
assistant banking commissioner with a felony conviction, as provided
for in Section 1408 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
36. Concealing bank transaction, as provided for in Section
1409 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
37. Improper maintenance of accounts or false or deceptive
entries and statements, as provided for in Section 1410 of Title 6
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
38. Payment of penalties and judgments against others, as
provided for in Section 1411 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
39. Embezzlement of bank funds, as provided for in Section 1412
of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
40. Circulation of statement or representation for the purpose
of injuring any bank institution, as provided for in Section 1413 of
Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
41. Authorizing, executing, or ratifying a criminal offense, as
provided for in subsection A of Section 1414 of Title 6 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 5

42. Violation of any lawful order of the Board or Commissioner,
as provided for in subsection C of Section 1414 of Title 6 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
43. Bank advertising with confusingly similar name, as provided
for in subsection A of Section 1417 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
44. Using shortened confusingly similar name for advertising,
as provided for in subsection B of Section 1417 of Title 6 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
45. Acquiring another bank but using former name, as provided
for in subsection C of Section 1417 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
46. Non-banking business using confusingly similar name, as
provided for in subsection D of Section 1417 of Title 6 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
47. Registered sex offender providing services in a child care
facility, as provided for in subsection F of Section 404.1 of Title
10 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
48. Failure to report child abuse, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 1-2-101 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
49. Interception of wire, oral, or electronic communication, as
provided for in paragraph 1 of Section 176.3 of Title 13 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
50. Using devices to intercept oral communication, as provided
for in paragraph 2 of Section 176.3 of Title 13 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
51. Disclosing contents of wire, oral, or electronic
communication, as provided for in paragraph 3 of Section 176.3 of
Title 13 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
52. Using contents of wire, oral, or electronic communication,
as provided for in paragraph 4 of Section 176.3 of Title 13 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 6

53. Removing, injuring, or obstructing telephone line, as
provided for in paragraph 5 of Section 176.3 of Title 13 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
54. Carrying devices for interception of wire, oral, or
electronic communication, as provided for in paragraph 6 of Section
176.3 of Title 13 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
55. Making devices for interception of wire, oral, or
electronic communication, as provided for in paragraph 7 of Section
176.3 of Title 13 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
56. Using communication facility in committing felonies, as
provided for in paragraph 8 of Section 176.3 of Title 13 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
57. Violation of the Oklahoma Consumer Protection Act, as
provided for in Section 753 of Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
58. Violation of the Home Repair Fraud Act, as provided for in
Section 765.3 of Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
59. Conduct closing-out sale without license, as provided for
in Section 767 of Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
60. Violation of the Unlawful Electronic Mail Act, as provided
for in Section 776.1 of Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
61. Violation of the Unlawful Electronic Mail Act for
commercial electronic mail, as provided for in Section 776.6 of
Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
62. Conceal or destroy corporation records, as provided for in
Section 16 of Title 17 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
63. Misapplication of funds, as provided for in Section 411 of
Title 18 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
64. Solicit funds to secure old age assistance by deception or
fraud, as provided for in Section 553.1 of Title 18 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
65. Inspector, judge, or clerk refusing to extend or enforce
the right to sign and deliver the certificate of election votes, as
provided for in Section 90 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 7

66. Knowing and willful failure or refusal to perform duties,
as provided for in Section 91 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
67. County officer failing to make daily deposit, as provided
for in Section 682 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
68. Use of false or illegal voucher by county official, as
provided for in Section 686 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
69. Gift to influence legislator, as provided for in Section
318 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
70. Legislator receiving payoff for employment of other, as
provided for in Section 321 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
71. Lobbying legislature on contingency fee basis, as provided
for in Section 334 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
72. Furnishing public supplies for profit, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 355 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
73. Purchase public supplies from business that employs family
member or spouse with more than five percent (5%) interest, as
provided for in subsection C of Section 355 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
74. Make false claim against the state, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 358 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
75. Bribing an officer, as provided for in Section 381 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
76. Bribing participant or official in athletic contest, as
provided for in Section 399 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
77. Engaging in pattern of criminal offenses, as provided for
in Section 425 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 8

78. Escape from county or city jail, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 443 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
79. Escape from the Department of Corrections or alternative
incarceration, as provided for in subsection B of Section 443 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
80. Escape from juvenile detention facility, as provided for in
subsection E of Section 443 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
81. Unauthorized entry into penal institution or jail, as
provided for in Section 445 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
82. Preparing false evidence, as provided for in Section 453 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
83. Bribing witness to falsely testify, as provided for in
Section 456 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
84. Larceny or destruction of records by clerk or officer, as
provided for in Section 461 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
85. Larceny or destruction of records by person other than
officers, as provided for in Section 462 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
86. Offer forged or false instruments for the record, as
provided for in Section 463 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
87. Perjury, as provided for in Section 491 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
88. Contradictory statements as perjury, as provided for in
Section 496 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
89. Perjury by subornation, as provided for in Section 504 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
90. Falsify public record, as provided for in Section 531 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 9

91. Fortifying access point to place where felony is being
committed, as provided for in Section 540C of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
92. Compounding a crime, as provided for in Section 543 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
93. Substitute a child to deceive a parent or guardian, as
provided for in Section 579 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
94. Record, listen to, or observe jury proceedings, as provided
for in Section 588 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
95. Abuse, sexual abuse, or exploitation of a vulnerable adult,
as provided for in subsection A of Section 843.3 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
96. Neglect of a vulnerable adult, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 843.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
97. Procuring an abortion, as provided for in Section 861 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
98. Adultery, as provided for in Section 871 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
99. Bigamy, as provided for in Section 881 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
100. Knowingly marrying a bigamist, as provided for in Section
884 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
101. Confidence game by cards, as provided for in Section 954
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
102. Dealing in gambling devices, as provided for in Section
984 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
103. Install communication of gambling information, as provided
for in Section 986 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 10

104. Dissemination of gambling information, as provided for in
Section 987 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
105. Conspiracy to violate gambling laws, as provided for in
Section 988 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
106. Engaging in prostitution while HIV-infected, as provided
for in subsection B of Section 1031 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
107. Engage in or operate prostitution within one thousand
(1,000) feet of a school or church, as provided for in subsection D
of Section 1031 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
108. Interactive computer service provider failing to remove
child pornography, third or subsequent offense, as provided for in
Section 1040.80 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
109. Gain or attempt to gain value from nonconsensual
dissemination of private sexual images, as provided for in
subsection G of Section 1040.13b of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
110. Sex offender entering safety zone around school, as
provided for in Section 1125 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
111. Unlawful removal of dead body, as provided for in Section
1161 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
112. Purchasing or, receiving, selling, or offering to sell a
dead body or the remains of a dead body reduced by natural organic
reduction, as provided for in Section 1162 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
113. Use of human remains as fertilizer or a soil additive to
grow food for human or livestock consumption, as provided for in
Section 1162 of this title;
114. Using photographic, electronic, or video equipment in
clandestine manner, as provided for in subsection B of Section 1171
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 11

114. 115. Obscene, threatening, or harassing phone call, second
or subsequent offense, as provided for in Section 1172 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
115. 116. Spreading infectious diseases, as provided for in
Section 1192 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
116. 117. Altering livestock appearance for exhibition, second
or subsequent offense, as provided for in Section 1229 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
117. 118. Unlawfully transport hazardous waste, as provided for
in Section 1230.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
118. 119. Unlawful waste management, as provided for in Section
1230.4 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
119. 120. False statements and acts concerning permits and
waste, as provided for in Section 1230.5 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
120. 121. Unlawful disposal of hazardous waste, as provided for
in Section 1230.6 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
121. 122. Attempts to violate the Sabotage Prevention Act, as
provided for in Section 1265.4 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
122. 123. Carry weapon with intent to injure another, as
provided for in Section 1278 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
123. 124. Teaching, demonstrating, or training use of firearms
in furtherance of riot, as provided for in Section 1320.10 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
124. 125. Delivering fraudulent bill of lading, as provided for
in Section 1411 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
125. 126. Maintaining fraudulent warehouse receipts, as
provided for in Section 1412 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 12

126. 127. Issuing duplicate bills of lading or warehouse
receipts, as provided for in Section 1414 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
127. 128. Selling goods without consent of holder of bill of
lading, as provided for in Section 1415 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
128. 129. Unlawful delivery of goods, value from Two Thousand
Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00), as provided for in paragraph 3 of Section 1416 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
129. 130. Burglary in the third degree, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 1435 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
130. 131. Embezzlement of property, value from Two Thousand
Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section 1451 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
131. 132. Extortion, as provided for in Section 1481 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
132. 133. Extortion induced by threats, as provided for in
Section 1482 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
133. 134. Obtain signatures by extortion, as provided for in
Section 1485 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
134. 135. Extortion by threatening letter, as provided for in
Section 1486 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
135. 136. Blackmail, as provided for in Section 1488 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
136. 137. Defrauding hotel, inn, or restaurant, value of One
Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more, as provided for in Section
1503 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
137. 138. Renting motor vehicle with bogus check, value of One
Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more, as provided for in Section
1521 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 13

138. 139. Receive money or property by impersonating another,
value from Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen
Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in paragraph 3 of
Section 1532 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
139. 140. False use of “State Police” with intent to
communicate policing authority, and another is injured, defrauded,
harassed, or vexed, as provided for in subsection G of Section 1533
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
140. 141. Identity theft, as provided for in Section 1533.1 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
141. 142. Felony value – false pretense, bogus check, con game,
valued from Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen
Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of
Section 1541.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
142. 143. Two or more false or bogus checks, valued from Two
Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section
1541.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
143. 144. Obtaining money or property with false negotiable
paper, as provided for in Section 1544 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
144. 145. Signs credit or debit card with intent to defraud, as
provided for in subsection (a) A of Section 1550.28 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
145. 146. Possess credit or debit card of another with intent
to defraud, as provided for in subsection (b) B of Section 1550.28
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
146. 147. Possessing incomplete credit cards with intent to
complete, as provided for in Section 1550.31 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
147. 148. Possess firearm with altered ID during commission of
a felony, as provided for in subsection A of Section 1550 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
148. 149. Make, sell, or display false identification for
felony purposes or to mislead police officer, as provided for in
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 14

subsection C of Section 1550.41 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
149. 150. Forgery of state, public, court, or corporate seals,
as provided for in Section 1571 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
150. 151. Forgery of records, as provided for in Section 1572
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
151. 152. Making false entry in records, as provided for in
Section 1573 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
152. 153. Forgery of certification or acknowledgement of
conveyance, as provided for in Section 1574 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
153. 154. Forgery II / Forgery III, valued from Two Thousand
Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section 1577 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
154. 155. Possession of forged evidence of debt, valued from
Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section
1578 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
155. 156. Possession of other forged instrument, valued from
Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section
1579 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
156. 157. Issuing spurious or false certificates of stock, as
provided for in Section 1580 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
157. 158. Reissuing canceled certificates of stock, as provided
for in Section 1581 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
158. 159. Issuing or pledging false evidence of debt, as
provided for in Section 1582 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
159. 160. Counterfeiting coin, as provided for in Section 1583
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 15

160. 161. Counterfeiting coin for exportation, as provided for
in Section 1584 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
161. 162. Forging process of court or title to property, as
provided for in Section 1585 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
162. 163. Making false entries in public book, as provided for
in Section 1586 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
163. 164. Forging tickets of passage, as provided for in
Section 1587 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
164. 165. Forging postage stamps, as provided for in Section
1588 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
165. 166. Falsification of corporate records, as provided for
in Section 1589 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
166. 167. Employee making false entries, as provided for in
Section 1590 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
167. 168. Possessing counterfeit coin with intent to circulate,
as provided for in Section 1591 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
168. 169. Uttering forged instruments, value from Two Thousand
Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section 1592 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
169. 170. Falsely procuring another’s signature, as provided
for in Section 1593 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
170. 171. Utter signature of another with same name, as
provided for in Section 1622 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
171. 172. Uttering one’s endorsement as another’s, as provided
for in Section 1623 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
172. 173. Erasure or alterations with intent to defraud, as
provided for in Section 1624 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 16

173. 174. Sign fictitious name as officer of corporation, as
provided for in Section 1626 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
174. 175. Fraudulent insolvency of corporation, as provided for
in Section 1639 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
175. 176. Workers’ compensation fraud, as provided for in
Section 1663 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
176. 177. Willfully poisoning animal, as provided for in
Section 1681 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
177. 178. Larceny of lost property, value from Two Thousand
Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00), as provided for in paragraph 3 of Section 1702 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
178. 179. Grand larceny, value from Two Thousand Five Hundred
Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), as
provided for in subsection A of Section 1705 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
179. 180. Larceny of written instrument, as provided for in
Section 1709 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
180. 181. Receive, possess, or conceal stolen property, value
from Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen
Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of
Section 1713 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
181. 182. Bringing stolen property into state, value from Two
Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in Section 1715 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
182. 183. Larceny of dogs, as provided for in Section 1718 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
183. 184. Larceny of or receiving stolen fowls, as provided for
in Section 1719 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 17

184. 185. Larceny of domesticated fish or game, value One
Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more, as provided for in Section
1719.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
185. 186. Larceny of auto, aircraft, or other motor vehicle,
value less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), as provided for
in Section 1720 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
186. 187. Larceny from building or house, as provided for in
Section 1723 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
187. 188. Possession of mercury, as provided for in Section
1726 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
188. 189. Entering with intent to steal copper, as provided for
in Section 1727 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
189. 190. Possessing, receiving, or transporting stolen copper,
as provided for in Section 1728 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
190. 191. Larceny of merchandise from retailer, value from Two
Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section
1731 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
191. 192. Larceny of trade secrets, value from Two Thousand
Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00), as provided for in Section 1732 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
192. 193. Procuring, selling, or receiving telephone records by
fraud (single telephone record), as provided for in subsection A of
Section 1742.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
193. 194. Injury to or obstruction of railroad, as provided for
in Section 1751 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
194. 195. Interfering with railroad, as provided for in Section
1752.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
195. 196. Possess, use, manufacture, or threaten to use
incendiary device or explosives without injury, as provided for in
Section 1767.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 18

196. 197. Removing or injuring piles securing bank or dam, as
provided for in Section 1777 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
197. 198. Maliciously injuring written instrument, value from
Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in Section 1779 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
198. 199. Place hard object or inflammable object in grain or
cotton, as provided for in Section 1837 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
199. 200. Selling five or more unlawful telecommunication
devices within six (6) months, as provided for in subsection B of
Section 1873 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
200. 201. Manufacturing five or more unlawful
telecommunications devices within six (6) months, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 1874 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
201. 202. Unauthorized removal of baggage or cargo from bus or
terminal, as provided for in Section 1904 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
202. 203. Access computer system or network with unlawful
intent, as provided for in Section 1958 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
203. 204. Reproduction of sound recording without consent, one
hundred (100) or more articles, as provided for in Section 1976 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
204. 205. Unlawfully sell sound recordings, as provided for in
Section 1977 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
205. 206. Broadcast or live recording for sale without consent,
as provided for in Section 1978 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
206. 207. Rent or sell articles without true name of
manufacturer, as provided for in Section 1979 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 19

207. 208. Counterfeiting recording or article label, as
provided for in Section 1980 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
208. 209. Violation of Trademark Anti-Counterfeiting Act, as
provided for in Section 1990.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
209. 210. Tampering with security equipment, as provided for in
Section 1993 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
210. 211. Sex offender engaging in ice cream truck vending, as
provided for in Section 2100.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
211. 212. Protective order violation, second or subsequent
offense, as provided for in subsection A of Section 60.6 of Title 22
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
212. 213. Protective order violation resulting in physical
injury, as provided for in subsection B of Section 60.6 of Title 22
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
213. 214. Disposal of seized liquor by officer, as provided for
in Section 1263 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
214. 215. False affidavits, as provided for in Section 1264 of
Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
215. 216. Interfering with voting machine, as provided for in
Section 9-118 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
216. 217. Voting illegally, as provided for in Section 16-102
of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
217. 218. Removing ballot from or carrying ballot into polling
place, as provided for in Section 16-102.1 of Title 26 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
218. 219. False application for an absentee ballot, as provided
for in Section 16-102.2 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
219. 220. False affidavit in voting registration, as provided
for in Section 16-103 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 20

220. 221. Causing unqualified persons to be invalidly
registered, as provided for in Section 16-103.1 of Title 26 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
221. 222. False notarization of absentee ballot, as provided
for in Section 16-104 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
222. 223. Perpetrate fraud or theft to affect election, as
provided for in Section 16-105 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
223. 224. Bribes to influence votes, as provided for in Section
16-106 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
224. 225. Offer bribe to withdraw as candidate, as provided for
in Section 16-107 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
225. 226. Solicit or accept bribe for withdrawal of candidacy,
as provided for in Section 16-108 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
226. 227. Prevent person from registering to vote or voting, as
provided for in Section 16-109 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
227. 228. Printing or possession of ballots illegally, as
provided for in Section 16-120 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
228. 229. Violation of the Oklahoma Pollutant Discharge
Elimination System Act, as provided for in subsection G of Section
2-6-206 of Title 27A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
229. 230. Falsely state information to the Department of
Environmental Quality, as provided for in Section 2-7-109 of Title
27A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
230. 231. Falsify information on permit application for
Oklahoma Solid Waste Management Act, as provided for in Section 2-
10-302 of Title 27A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
231. 232. Violation of use of solid waste disposal sites, as
provided for in Section 2-10-801 of Title 27A of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
232. 233. Filing false sale with Insurance Banking
Commissioner, as provided for in Section 311.1 of Title 36 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 21

233. 234. Selling insurance with revoked or suspended license,
as provided for in subsection A of Section 1435.26 of Title 36 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
234. 235. Aiding or conspiring with a person whose insurance
license is revoked or suspended, as provided for in subsection B of
Section 1435.26 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
235. 236. False statements, reports, or filings with intent to
deceive Insurance Banking Commissioner, as provided for in
subsection E of Section 1643 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
236. 237. Violation of the Viatical Settlements Act of 2008,
value from Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) to Two Thousand Five
Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00), as provided for in subsection F of
Section 4055.14 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
237. 238. Violation of prepaid funeral provisions, as provided
for in Section 6130 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
238. 239. Out-of-state retailer shipping alcoholic beverages
into state, as provided for in Section 3-101 of Title 37A of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
239. 240. Permit invitee under twenty-one (21) to possess or
consume alcohol, as provided for in subsection A of Section 6-101 of
Title 37A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
240. 241. Permit invitee under twenty-one (21) to possess or
consume alcohol resulting in great bodily injury or death, as
provided for in subsection C of Section 6-101 of Title 37A of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
241. 242. Sale of alcoholic beverages outside of authorized day
or hours, as provided for in Section 6-123 of Title 37A of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
242. 243. Disclosing confidential information concerning
violation of Employment Security Act of 1980, as provided for in
Section 4-508 of Title 40 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
243. 244. Hiring armed guards without permit, as provided for
in Section 169 of Title 40 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 22

244. 245. Causing employee death by commanding to enter steam
boiler, as provided for in Section 183 of Title 40 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
245. 246. False statement about lien by contractor, as provided
for in Section 142.4 of Title 42 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
246. 247. Mechanics liens/embezzlement, valued from Two
Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in Section 142.6 of Title 42
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
247. 248. Marrying prohibited persons, as provided for in
Section 14 of Title 43 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
248. 249. Bigamy and remarriage, as provided for in Section 123
of Title 43 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
249. 250. Mistreatment of mental health patient, as provided
for in Section 2-219 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
250. 251. Violation of opioid substitution treatment program,
as provided for in Section 3-601 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
251. 252. Coerce another to execute a declaration of revocation
of an advanced directive, as provided for in subsection D of Section
11-113 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
252. 253. Unauthorized use of implement of husbandry, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 4-102 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
253. 254. Receive, possess, or conceal implement of husbandry,
as provided for in subsection B of Section 4-103 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
254. 255. Removed, falsified, or unauthorized identification,
as provided for in subsection A of Section 4-107 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
255. 256. Buy, receive, possess, or sell motor vehicle with VIN
removed or defaced with intent to conceal, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 4-107 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 23

256. 257. Destroying, removing, altering, covering, or
counterfeiting trim tag plates, as provided for in Section 4-107a of
Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
257. 258. Misuse of manufactured home certificate of title, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 4-110 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
258. 259. Alter manufactured home certificate of title, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 4-110 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
259. 260. Remove receipt with intent to misrepresent payment of
tax or fees, as provided for in subsection B of Section 4-110 of
Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
260. 261. Purchase registration receipt on assigned certificate
of title, as provided for in subsection B of Section 4-110 of Title
47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
261. 262. Misuse of forged, counterfeit, or suspended driver
license, as provided for in Section 6-301 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
262. 263. Perjury through false affidavit, as provided for in
Section 6-302 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
263. 264. Interference with traffic control device resulting in
injury or death, as provided for in subsection B of Section 11-207
of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
264. 265. Buy, sell, or dispose vehicle with altered VIN, chop
shop, as provided for in subsection C of Section 1503 of Title 47 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
265. 266. Attempt to violate chop shop laws, as provided for in
subsection D of Section 1503 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
266. 267. Perjury before the Corporation Commission, as
provided for in Section 108 of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
267. 268. Delay probation duties of the Corporation Commission
with use or attempted use of firearms, as provided for in Section
114 of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 24

268. 269. Conspiracy to violate Oklahoma Oil and Gas
Conservation Act, as provided for in Section 115 of Title 52 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
269. 270. Corruption of Corporation Commission, as provided for
in Section 117 of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
270. 271. Misappropriation of gas, as provided for in Section
235 of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
271. 272. Falsification of application for emergency relief, as
provided for in Section 26.18 of Title 56 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
272. 273. Medicaid fraud, as provided for in Section 1005 of
Title 56 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
273. 274. Fraudulently obtaining or receiving assistance, value
of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or more, as provided for in
Section 1005.1 of Title 56 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
274. 275. Carry contraband into jail or prison, as provided for
in subsection B of Section 21 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
275. 276. Possess cell phone in jail or prison, as provided for
in subsection E of Section 21 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
276. 277. Jail employee receiving compensation from inmate,
value of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or more, as provided for in
Section 22 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
277. 278. Use of convict labor on private property, as provided
for in Section 222 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
278. 279. Failure to comply with Mary Rippy Violent Crime
Offenders Registration Act, as provided for in Section 599 of Title
57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
279. 280. Practicing dentistry without a license, as provided
for in subsection B of Section 328.49 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
280. 281. Giving false information to obtain license, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 328.49 of Title 59 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 25

281. 282. Impersonating a pharmacist, as provided for in
Section 353.17A of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
282. 283. Alteration of prescription or unlawful dispensing of
drugs, second violation, as provided for in Section 353.24 of Title
59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
283. 284. False representation in procuring license under the
Oklahoma Pharmacy Act, as provided for in subsection B of Section
353.25 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
284. 285. Cremation without license and permit, as provided for
in Section 396.33 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
285. 286. Practicing medicine without a license, as provided
for in Section 491 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
286. 287. Violation of the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act,
as provided for in Section 638 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
287. 288. Acting as building inspector without a license, as
provided for in Section 1044 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
288. 289. Affidavit as to undertaking, as provided for in
Section 1322 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
289. 290. Bail jumping, as provided for in Section 1335 of
Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
290. 291. False declaration of ownership in pawn shop, value of
One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more, if property is firearms,
or was acquired through robbery or burglary, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 1512 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
291. 292. Violation of Oklahoma Security Guard and Private
Investigator Act, as provided for in subsection B of Section 1750.11
of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
292. 293. Collusion among bidders, as provided for in Section
115 of Title 61 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
293. 294. Disclosure of terms of bids, as provided for in
Section 116 of Title 61 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 26

294. 295. False or illegal voucher by public official, as
provided for in Section 81 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
295. 296. Use of facsimile signature or seal with intent to
defraud, as provided for in Section 604 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
296. 297. Distribution of controlled substance, possession with
intent, Schedule III, IV, and V drugs, as provided for in subsection
A of Section 2-401 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
297. 298. Distribution of counterfeit controlled substance,
possession with intent, Schedule III, IV, and V drugs, as provided
for in subsection A of Section 2-401 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
298. 299. Robbery of controlled dangerous substance, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 2-403 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
299. 300. Distribute or dispense controlled substance without
required order form, as provided for in subsection A of Section 2-
404 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
300. 301. Manufacture, distribute, or dispense controlled
substance not authorized by registration, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 2-404 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
301. 302. Omit, remove, alter, or obliterate symbol required on
controlled substance, as provided for in subsection A of Section 2-
404 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
302. 303. Refuse or fail to make, keep, or furnish required
information, as provided for in subsection A of Section 2-404 of
Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
303. 304. Refuse entry or inspection of premises with respect
to controlled substance, as provided for in subsection A of Section
2-404 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
304. 305. Maintain place for keeping or selling controlled
substance, as provided for in subsection A of Section 2-404 of Title
63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 27

305. 306. Sell, transfer, or provide money transmitter
equipment to unlicensed person, second or subsequent offense, as
provided for in subsection A of Section 2-503.1d of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
306. 307. Responsibility of permit holders, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 124.8 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
307. 308. Purchase or sell body parts for transplantation, as
provided for in Section 2200.16A of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
308. 309. Falsification, forgery, concealment, defacement, or
obliteration of document of gift, as provided for in Section
2200.17A of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
309. 310. Unlawful possession of vessel or motor, as provided
for in Section 4209 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
310. 311. Receive, possess, sell, or dispose of stolen vessel
or motor, as provided for in Section 4209.1 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
311. 312. Remove or alter ID number of vessel, as provided for
in subsection B of Section 4209.2 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
312. 313. Buy, receive, possess, or dispose of vessel with
false ID number with intent to conceal, as provided for in
subsection D of Section 4209.2 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
313. 314. False statement in application for certificate of
title for stolen vehicle, as provided for in Section 4209.3 of Title
63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
314. 315. Alteration or forging of vessel certificate of title,
as provided for in Section 4209.4 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
315. 316. Possess vessel with altered ID number, as provided
for in subsection C of Section 4253 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 28

316. 317. Destroying or falsifying checks to the Land Office,
as provided for in Section 1026 of Title 64 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
317. 318. Prospecting on public lands without permit, as
provided for in Section 1094 of Title 64 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
318. 319. Business for profit by a member of the Department of
Transportation, as provided for in subsection B of Section 304 of
Title 66 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
319. 320. Business for profit by a member of the Department of
Transportation, as provided for in subsection B of Section 324 of
Title 66 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
320. 321. Failure to comply with request for county records, as
provided for in Section 83 of Title 67 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
321. 322. Refusal to file tax return with intent to defraud, as
provided for in Section 240.1 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
322. 323. Filing false sales tax report, as provided for in
Section 241 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
323. 324. Possession of controlled dangerous substances without
tax stamp, as provided for in Section 450.8 of Title 68 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
324. 325. Remove tax stamp with intent to reuse, as provided
for in Section 450.9 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
325. 326. Making false oath to report required by Cotton
Manufacturers Act, as provided for in Section 2003 of Title 68 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
326. 327. File false income tax return with intent to defraud,
as provided for in Section 2376 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
327. 328. Fraudulent tax receipt by county treasurer, as
provided for in Section 2920 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
328. 329. False or fraudulent lists of taxable property, as
provided for in Section 2945 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 29

329. 330. False application under Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program
Act, as provided for in Section 3609 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
330. 331. False application under Former Military Facility
Development Act, as provided for in Section 3807 of Title 68 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
331. 332. False application under Oklahoma Specialized Quality
Investment Act, as provided for in Section 4109 of Title 68 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
332. 333. False application under Oklahoma Quality Investment
Act, as provided for in Section 4209 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
333. 334. Conflict of interest by a member of the
Transportation Commission, as provided for in Section 310 of Title
69 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
334. 335. Conflict of interest by a member of the Oklahoma
Turnpike Authority, as provided for in Section 1705 of Title 69 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
335. 336. Violation of Oklahoma Highway Code of 1968, as
provided for in Section 1802 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
336. 337. Conflict of interest by Oklahoma Educational
Television Authority member, as provided for in Section 23-106 of
Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
337. 338. Alter or destroy audit records by Board of Regents,
as provided for in subsection E of Section 3909 of Title 70 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
338. 339. Authority to receive gifts or funds, as provided for
in subsection B of Section 4306 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
339. 340. Make takeover offer which is not effective under
Oklahoma Take-over Disclosure Act of 1985, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 453 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 30

340. 341. Fraudulent, deceptive, or manipulative acts in
takeover offer, as provided for in Section 455 of Title 71 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
341. 342. Violation of Oklahoma Take-over Disclosure Act of
1985, as provided for in Section 460 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
342. 343. Conflict of interest by Oklahoma Capitol Improvement
Authority member, as provided for in Section 162 of Title 73 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
343. 344. Fraud in obtaining certification as a minority
business, as provided for in Section 85.45h of Title 74 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
344. 345. False statement for small business surety bond
guarantee, as provided for in Section 85.47h of Title 74 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
345. 346. Forge or alter criminal history record, as provided
for in subsection D of Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
346. 347. Making or receiving kickback, as provided for in
Section 3404 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
347. 348. Pooling of bridge or highway contracts, as provided
for in Section 101 of Title 79 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
348. 349. Business for profit by Oklahoma Water Resources Board
member, as provided for in Section 1086.3 of Title 82 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
349. 350. Conflict of interest by water district official or
employee, as provided for in Section 1281 of Title 82 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
350. 351. Falsely executes a written declaration as a witness
to a will, as provided for in paragraph 6 of Section 55 of Title 84
of the Oklahoma Statutes; and
351. 352. False statement and misrepresentation, as provided
for in Section 6 of Title 85A of the Oklahoma Statutes.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 31

B. Any person convicted of a Class D1 criminal offense set
forth in this section shall be punished by imprisonment in the
custody of the Department of Corrections for a term of not more than
five (5) years and shall serve at least twenty percent (20%) of the
sentence imposed before release from custody including release to
electronic monitoring pursuant to Section 510.9 of Title 57 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
C. 1. Every person who, having been previously convicted of
one or two Class C or Class D criminal offenses, commits a Class D1
criminal offense shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment
in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a term of not
less than one (1) year nor more than seven (7) years and shall serve
at least twenty percent (20%) of the sentence imposed before release
from custody including release to electronic monitoring pursuant to
Section 510.9 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
2. Every person who, having been previously convicted of three
Class C or Class D criminal offenses, or one or more Class Y, Class
A, or Class B criminal offenses, commits a Class D1 criminal offense
shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment in the custody
of the Department of Corrections for a term of not less than two (2)
years nor more than ten (10) years and shall serve at least thirty
percent (30%) of the sentence imposed before release from custody
including release to electronic monitoring pursuant to Section 510.9
of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
D. Unless specifically exempted pursuant to subsection E of
this section, Section 51.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this
title shall not apply to Class D1 criminal offenses.
E. The criminal offenses listed in paragraphs 98, 108, 212,
213, 214, and 229 230 of subsection A of this section shall be
exempt from the penalty provisions provided for in subsections B and
C of this section. Persons convicted of the criminal offenses
provided for in paragraphs 98, 108, 212, 213, 214, and 229 230 of
subsection A of this section shall be punished in accordance with
the corresponding penalties provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes
including Section 51.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this
title.
F. All Class D1 criminal offenses shall be punishable by the
corresponding fines as provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 32

SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1162, as
amended by Section 402, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1162), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1162. A. Whoever purchases, or who receives, except
for the purpose of burial, any dead body of a human being, knowing
the same has been removed contrary to Section 1161 of this title,
shall be guilty of a Class D1 felony offense punishable by
imprisonment as provided for in subsections B through F E of Section
20N of this title, or by a fine not exceeding Five Hundred Dollars
($500.00), or by both such fine imprisonment and imprisonment fine.
B. Any individual who sells or offers to sell the remains of a
dead body reduced by natural organic reduction except by a licensed
funeral director for any other commercial use shall be guilty of a
Class D1 felony offense punishable by imprisonment as provided for
in subsections B through E of Section 20N of this title, a fine not
exceeding Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or by both such
imprisonment and fine.
C. Any individual who uses soil produced by natural organic
reduction, as defined in Section 396.2 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, to grow food for human or livestock consumption shall be
guilty of a Class D1 felony offense punishable by imprisonment as
provided for in subsections B through E of Section 20N of this
title, a fine not exceeding Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or by
both such imprisonment and fine.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 396.2, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 396.2. As used in the Funeral Services Licensing Act:
1. “Alkaline hydrolysis” means the technical process for
reducing human remains to bone fragments and essential elements in a
licensed crematory using heat, pressure, water, and base chemical
agents;
2. “Apprentice” means a person who is engaged in learning the
practice of embalming or the practice of funeral directing under the
instruction and personal supervision of a duly licensed embalmer or
a duly licensed funeral director of and in this state, pursuant to
the provisions of the Funeral Services Licensing Act, and who is
duly registered as such with the Oklahoma Funeral Board;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 33

3. “Authorizing agent” means a person legally entitled to order
the cremation, natural organic reduction, or final disposition of
particular human remains pursuant to Section 1151 or 1158 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
4. “Commercial embalming establishment” means a fixed place of
business consisting of an equipped preparation room, and other rooms
as necessary, for the specified purpose of performing preparation
and shipping services of human remains to funeral establishments
inside and outside this state;
5. “Cremation” means the technical process, using heat and
flame, or heat and pressure, that reduces human remains to essential
elements, including bone fragments. Such cremation process takes
place through heat and evaporation. Cremation shall include, but
not be limited to, the processing and pulverization of the bone
fragments. Cremation does not include natural organic reduction;
6. “Crematory” means a structure containing a furnace or
alkaline hydrolysis vessel or natural organic reduction vessel used
or intended to be used for the cremation or natural organic
reduction of human remains. The term includes a facility that
cremates human remains through alkaline hydrolysis;
7. “Directing a funeral” or “funeral directing” means directing
funeral services from the time of the first call until final
disposition or release to a common carrier or release to next of kin
of the deceased or the designee of the next of kin;
8. “Embalmer” means a person who disinfects or preserves dead
human remains, entire or in part, by the use of chemical substances,
fluids or gases in the remains, or by the introduction of same into
the remains by vascular or hypodermic injection, or by direct
application into organs or cavities;
9. “First call” means the beginning of the relationship and
duty of the funeral director to take charge of human remains and
have such remains prepared by embalming, cremation, natural organic
reduction, or otherwise, for burial or disposition, in compliance
with all laws pertaining to public health in this state. First call
does not include calls made by ambulance, when the person
dispatching the ambulance does not know whether or not human remains
are to be picked up;
2. 10. “Funeral director” means a person who:
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 34

a. is engaged in or conducts or represents themselves
himself or herself as being engaged in preparing for
the burial or disposal and directing and supervising
the burial or disposal of dead human remains,
b. is engaged in or conducts or represents themselves
himself or herself as being engaged in maintaining a
funeral establishment for the preparation and the
disposition, or for the care of dead human remains,
c. uses, in connection with the name of the person or
funeral establishment, the words “funeral director” or
“undertaker” or “mortician” or any other title
implying that the person is engaged as a funeral
director,
d. sells funeral service merchandise to the public, or
e. is responsible for the legal and ethical operation of
a crematory or natural organic reduction facility;
3. 11. “Funeral director in charge” means an individual
licensed as both a funeral director and embalmer designated by a
funeral establishment, commercial embalming establishment, or
crematory who is responsible for the legal and ethical operation of
the establishment and is accountable to the Board;
12. “Funeral establishment” means a place of business used in
the care and preparation for burial, commercial embalming, or
transportation of dead human remains, or any place where any person
or persons shall hold forth and be engaged in the profession of
undertaking or funeral directing;
4. “Apprentice” means a person who is engaged in learning the
practice of embalming or the practice of funeral directing, as the
case may be, under the instruction and personal supervision of a
duly licensed embalmer or a duly licensed funeral director of and in
the State of Oklahoma, pursuant to the provisions of the Funeral
Services Licensing Act, and who is duly registered as such with said
Board;
5. “Board” means the Oklahoma Funeral Board;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 35

6. “Directing a funeral” or “funeral directing” means directing
funeral services from the time of the first call until final
disposition or release to a common carrier or release to next of kin
of the deceased or the designee of the next of kin;
7. “First call” means the beginning of the relationship and
duty of the funeral director to take charge of dead human remains
and have such remains prepared by embalming, cremation, or
otherwise, for burial or disposition, provided all laws pertaining
to public health in this state are complied with. First call does
not include calls made by ambulance, when the person dispatching the
ambulance does not know whether or not dead human remains are to be
picked up;
13. “Funeral service merchandise” or “funeral services” means
those products and services normally provided by funeral
establishments and required to be listed on the General Price List
of the Federal Trade Commission, 16 C.F.R., Part 453, including, but
not limited to, the sale of burial supplies and equipment, but
excluding the sale by a cemetery of lands or interests, incidental
services, markers, memorials, monuments, equipment, crypts, niches,
or outer enclosures;
14. “Natural organic reduction” means the contained accelerated
reduction and conversion of human remains in soil in a natural
organic reduction facility within a licensed crematory using heat,
water, and organic material;
15. “Natural organic reduction facility” means a structure
containing equipment used or intended to be used for natural organic
reduction;
16. “Natural organic reduction vessel” means a specialized
environmentally controlled vessel that reduces human remains to
soil. Such vessel shall be composed of stainless steel;
17. “Outer enclosure” means a grave liner, grave box, or grave
vault; and
8. 18. “Personal supervision” means the physical presence of a
licensed funeral director or embalmer at the specified time and
place of the providing of acts of funeral service;
9. “Commercial embalming establishment” means a fixed place of
business consisting of an equipped preparation room, and other rooms
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 36

as necessary, for the specified purpose of performing preparation
and shipping services of dead human remains to funeral
establishments inside and outside this state;
10. “Funeral service merchandise or funeral services” means
those products and services normally provided by funeral
establishments and required to be listed on the General Price List
of the Federal Trade Commission, 15 U.S.C., Section 57a(a),
including, but not limited to, the sale of burial supplies and
equipment, but excluding the sale by a cemetery of lands or
interests therein, services incidental thereto, markers, memorials,
monuments, equipment, crypts, niches or outer enclosures;
11. “Outer enclosure” means a grave liner, grave box, or grave
vault;
12. “Funeral director in charge” means an individual licensed
as both a funeral director and embalmer designated by a funeral
service establishment, commercial embalming establishment, or
crematory who is responsible for the legal and ethical operation of
the establishment and is accountable to the Board;
13. “Authorizing agent” means a person legally entitled to
order the cremation or final disposition of particular human remains
pursuant to Section 1151 or 1158 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
14. “Cremation” means the technical process, using heat and
flame, or heat and pressure, that reduces human remains to essential
elements, including bone fragments. The reduction takes place
through heat and evaporation. Cremation shall include, but not be
limited to, the processing and pulverization of the bone fragments,
or through alkaline hydrolysis;
15. “Crematory” means a structure containing a furnace or
alkaline hydrolysis vessel used or intended to be used for the
cremation of human remains. The term includes a facility that
cremates human remains through alkaline hydrolysis; and
16. “Alkaline hydrolysis” means the reduction of human remains
to bone fragments and essential elements in a licensed crematory
using heat, pressure, water and base chemical agents.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 396.3a, is
amended to read as follows:
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 37

Section 396.3a. The following persons, professions and
businesses shall be required to be licensed pursuant to the Funeral
Services Licensing Act:
1. Any person engaged or who may engage in:
a. the practice or profession of funeral directing,
cremating, natural organic reduction, or embalming,
b. maintaining the business of a funeral establishment
or, commercial embalming establishment, or crematory,
c. the sale of any funeral service merchandise, or
d. providing funeral services; and
2. Any funeral establishment or, commercial embalming
establishment, or crematory.
SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 396.4, as
amended by Section 3, Chapter 381, O.S.L. 2025 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 396.4), is amended to read as follows:
Section 396.4. A. 1. The Oklahoma Funeral Board shall set
fees pursuant to rule for all licenses, registrations, examinations,
and renewals required by the Funeral Services Licensing Act.
2. Until the Oklahoma Funeral Board sets fees pursuant to rule,
the following shall be the fees charged for the licenses,
registrations, and examinations required by the Funeral Services
Licensing Act:
Funeral Director License or Renewal $75.00
Assistant Funeral Director License or Renewal $150.00
Embalmer License or Renewal $75.00
Registration for Funeral Director/Embalmer Apprentice $150.00
Extension of Funeral Director/Embalmer Apprentice $150.00
Embalmer Examination $100.00
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 38

Funeral Director Examination $100.00
State Law Examination $100.00
Funeral Establishment License or Renewal $250.00
Commercial Embalming Establishment License or Renewal $250.00
Reciprocal License for Funeral Director or Embalmer $150.00
Change of Funeral Director in Charge $150.00
Crematory License or Renewal $250.00
Natural Organic Reduction Facility License or Renewal $750.00
B. The Oklahoma Funeral Board shall assess Three Dollars
($3.00) for each disposition performed by the licensed funeral
establishment or commercial embalming establishment. The
disposition fee shall be payable upon renewal of the license as
provided in subsection E of this section and shall be calculated
from November 1 of the preceding calendar year to October 31 of the
current calendar year for each licensee. For purposes of this
subsection, “disposition” means each time the licensed establishment
files an original death certificate pursuant to Section 1-317 of
Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
C. Fees for funeral director, embalmer, and state law
examinations shall be paid prior to the scheduled examination. An
examination fee shall not be refundable.
D. The Oklahoma Funeral Board is authorized to determine and
fix special administrative service fees. Each such fee shall not be
in excess of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00).
E. If any renewal fee required by this section is not paid on
or before December 31 of each year, the amount of the fee shall be
doubled and if the fee is not paid on or before April 30 of the
subsequent year, the licensee shall be in default and the license
shall terminate automatically.
F. All examinations of the Oklahoma Funeral Board shall be
exempt from the Oklahoma Open Records Act in order to maintain the
integrity of the examination process. Copies of completed
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 39

examinations shall only be released upon receipt of a court order
from a court of competent jurisdiction.
SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 396.12, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 396.12. A. Any place where a person shall hold forth
by word or act that the person is engaged in the profession of
undertaking or funeral directing shall be deemed as a funeral
establishment and shall be licensed as such pursuant to the
provisions of the Funeral Services Licensing Act.
B. A funeral establishment shall not do business in a location
that is not licensed as a funeral establishment, shall not advertise
a service that is available from an unlicensed location, and shall
advertise itself by the name that the establishment is licensed as
pursuant to the Funeral Services Licensing Act.
C. Every funeral establishment, commercial embalming
establishment, and crematory shall be operated by a funeral director
in charge. Each establishment license shall be conspicuously
displayed at the location.
D. The Oklahoma Funeral Board shall have the power to inspect
the premises in which funeral directing is conducted or where
embalming or, cremation, or natural organic reduction is practiced
or where an applicant proposed to practice, and the Board is hereby
empowered to prescribe and endorse rules for reasonable sanitation
of such establishments, including necessary drainage, ventilation,
and necessary and suitable instruments for the business or
profession of embalming and, funeral directing, cremating, and
naturally organically reducing.
E. Any place where a person shall hold forth by word or act
that such person is engaged in the preparing and shipping of dead
human remains to funeral establishments inside and outside this
state shall be deemed a commercial embalming establishment and shall
be licensed as such pursuant to the provisions of the Funeral
Services Licensing Act.
SECTION 7. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 396.12c, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 396.12c. A. After notice and hearing pursuant to
Article II of the Administrative Procedures Act, the Oklahoma
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 40

Funeral Board may refuse to issue or renew, or may revoke or
suspend, any license or registration for any one or combination of
the following:
1. Conviction of a felony crime that substantially relates to
the occupation of a funeral director and poses a reasonable threat
to public safety;
2. Conviction of a misdemeanor involving funeral services;
3. Gross malpractice or gross incompetency, which shall be
determined by the Board;
4. False or misleading advertising as a funeral director or
embalmer;
5. Violation of any of the provisions of the Funeral Services
Licensing Act or any violation of Sections 201 through 231 of Title
8 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
6. Fraud or misrepresentation in obtaining a license;
7. Using any casket or part thereof which has previously been
used as a receptacle for, or in connection with, the burial or other
disposition of dead human remains, unless the disclosure is made to
the purchaser;
8. Violation of any rules of the Board in administering the
purposes of the Funeral Services Licensing Act;
9. Use of intoxicating liquor sufficient to produce drunkenness
in public, or habitual addiction to the use of habit-forming drugs
or either;
10. Solicitation of business, either personally or by an agent,
from a dying individual or the relatives of a dead or individual
with a terminal condition, as defined by the Oklahoma Advance
Directive Act, other than through general advertising;
11. Refusing to properly release a dead human body to the
custody of the person entitled to custody;
12. Violating applicable state laws relating to the failure to
file a death certificate, cremation or natural organic reduction
permit, or prearrangement or prefinancing of a funeral;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 41

13. Failing to obtain other necessary permits as required by
law in a timely manner;
14. Failing to comply with the Funeral Rules funeral rules of
the Federal Trade Commission, 15 U.S.C., Section 57a(a);
15. Failing to comply with any applicable provisions of the
Funeral Services Licensing Act at the time of issuance or renewal;
16. Improper issuance or renewal of a license or registration;
17. Violating the provisions of subsection B of Section 396.12
of this title regarding advertisement of services at locations not
licensed by the Board;
18. The abuse of a corpse whereby a person knowingly and
willfully signs a certificate as having embalmed, cremated, reduced,
or prepared a dead human body for disposition when, in fact, the
services were not performed as indicated;
19. Simultaneous Simultaneously cremating of or naturally
organically reducing more than one human dead body without express
written approval of the authorizing agent;
20. Cremating or naturally organically reducing human remains
without the permit required by Section 1-329.1 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
21. Intentional interference with an investigation by the Board
or failure to allow access to funeral records during an
investigation or to produce records for an investigation; or
22. Failure to properly discharge financial obligations as
established by rule of the Board.
B. As used in this section:
1. “Substantially relates” means the nature of criminal conduct
for which the person was convicted has a direct bearing on the
fitness or ability to perform one or more of the duties or
responsibilities necessarily related to the occupation; and
2. “Poses a reasonable threat” means the nature of criminal
conduct for which the person was convicted involved an act or threat
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 42

of harm against another and has a bearing on the fitness or ability
to serve the public or work with others in the occupation.
SECTION 8. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 396.29, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 396.29. A. The person charged by law with the duty of
burying the body of a deceased person may discharge such duty by
causing the body to be cremated or naturally organically reduced as
authorized and provided for in the following sections of this
article title, but the body of a deceased person shall not be
disposed of by cremation, natural organic reduction, or other
similar means, within the State of Oklahoma this state, except in a
crematory or natural organic reduction facility duly licensed as
provided for herein, and then only under a special permit for
cremation or natural organic reduction issued in accordance with the
provisions hereof.
B. Upon the completion of each cremation or natural organic
reduction, and insofar as is practicable, all of the recoverable
residue of the cremation or reduction process shall be removed from
the crematory or natural organic reduction vessel and placed in a
separate container so that the residue may not be commingled with
the cremated or reduced remains of other persons. Cremated or
reduced remains of a dead human shall not be divided or separated
without the prior written consent of the authorizing agent.
C. A funeral director or funeral establishment that has
received express written authorization for final disposition or,
cremation, or natural organic reduction from the authorizing agent
shall not be liable if the final disposition or, cremation, or
reduction is performed in accordance with the provisions of the
Funeral Services Licensing Act. The funeral director or funeral
establishment shall not be liable for following in a reasonable
fashion the instructions of any persons who falsely represent
themselves as the proper authorizing agents.
D. Absent the receipt of a court order or other suitable
confirmation of resolution, a funeral director or funeral
establishment shall not be liable for refusing to accept human
remains for final disposition or, cremation, or natural organic
reduction if the funeral director or other agent of the funeral
establishment:
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 43

1. Is aware of any dispute concerning the final disposition or,
cremation, or reduction of the human remains; or
2. Has a reasonable basis for questioning any of the
representations made by the authorizing agent.
E. Each funeral establishment which offers or performs
cremations or natural organic reductions shall maintain an
identification system that ensures the ability of the funeral
establishment to identify the human remains in its possession
throughout all phases of the cremation or reduction process. Upon
completion of the cremation or reduction process, the crematory
operator or natural organic reduction facility operator shall attest
to the identity of the cremated or reduced remains and the date,
time, and place the cremation or reduction process occurred on a
form prescribed by rule of the Oklahoma Funeral Board. The form
shall accompany the human remains in all phases of transportation,
cremation or natural organic reduction, and the return of the
cremated or reduced remains.
F. The authorizing agent is responsible for the disposition of
the cremated or naturally organically reduced remains. If, after
sixty (60) calendar days from the date of cremation or reduction,
the authorizing agent or the representative of the agent has not
specified the ultimate disposition or claimed the cremated or
reduced remains, the funeral establishment in possession of the
cremated or reduced remains may dispose of the cremated or reduced
remains in a dignified and humane manner in accordance with any
state, county, or municipal laws or provisions regarding the
disposition of cremated or reduced remains, except as provided in
subsection G of this section. A record of this disposition shall be
made and kept by the entity making the disposition. Upon the
disposition of unclaimed cremated or reduced remains in accordance
with this subsection, the funeral establishment and entity which
disposed of the cremated or reduced remains shall be discharged from
any legal obligation or liability concerning the disposition of the
cremated or reduced remains.
G. If the authorizing agent determines that the unclaimed
cremated or naturally organically reduced remains are those of a
military veteran, the funeral establishment may transfer the remains
to a charitable organization approved by the Military Department of
the State of Oklahoma for the purpose of providing a dignified and
honorable funeral for the veteran at a veterans cemetery. The
charitable organization shall be listed as an exempt organization
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 44

under Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C.,
Section 501(c). Upon the transfer of the veteran’s remains to the
charitable organization, the funeral establishment shall be
discharged from any legal obligation or liability concerning the
disposition of the cremated or reduced remains.
SECTION 9. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 396.32, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 396.32. The residue resulting from the cremation or
natural organic reduction of the body of a deceased person may be
transported in this state in any manner, without any permit
therefor, and may be disposed of in any manner desired or directed
by the person or persons charged by law with the duty of burying the
body.
SECTION 10. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 396.33, as
amended by Section 534, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (59 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 396.33), is amended to read as follows:
Section 396.33. Disposing of the body of a deceased person by
cremation, natural organic reduction, or other similar means, within
the State of Oklahoma this state, except in a crematory duly
licensed as provided for in Section 25 396.30 of this act title or a
natural organic reduction facility duly licensed as provided for in
Section 11 of this act and under a special permit for cremation or
natural organic reduction issued in accordance with the provisions
of Section 1-329.1 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes, is hereby
declared to be a Class D1 felony offense. Any person who violates
the provisions of this section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of
a Class D1 felony offense and shall be punished by imprisonment as
provided for in subsections B through F E of Section 20N of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 11. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 396.34 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. No person shall dispose of the body of any deceased person
by natural organic reduction or other similar means within this
state without first having obtained from the Oklahoma Funeral Board
an annual license to operate a natural organic reduction facility.
B. Application for an annual license shall be made to the
Executive Director of the Board upon forms prescribed and furnished
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 45

by the Executive Director, shall give the location of the natural
organic reduction facility and any other information as the
Executive Director shall require, and shall be accompanied by the
natural organic reduction facility license fee pursuant to Section
396.4 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes. A natural organic
reduction facility shall not be licensed separately from a funeral
or commercial embalming establishment but shall be licensed in
conjunction with and operated by a funeral or commercial embalming
establishment. Annual licenses shall expire on December 31 each
year; shall specify the name or names of the owners of the crematory
and the location thereof, and the funeral director in charge; and
shall not be transferable either as to the ownership of the natural
organic reduction facility, the funeral director in charge, or the
location thereof. The first annual license issued for any natural
organic reduction facility at any location shall not be issued by
the Executive Director until the Executive Director has been
satisfied.
C. All funeral establishments performing natural organic
reduction shall have a licensed funeral director in charge.
D. Each funeral establishment performing reduction services
shall keep records as required by the Board to assure compliance
with all laws relating to the disposition of human remains and shall
file annually with the Board a report in the form prescribed by the
Board describing the operations of the licensee, including the
number of reductions performed, the disposition thereof, and any
other information that the Board may require by rule.
E. A funeral establishment performing reduction services shall
be subject to all local, state, and federal health and environmental
requirements and shall obtain all necessary licenses and permits
from the Board and the appropriate federal and state health and
environmental authorities.
F. All natural organic reduction facilities shall be subject to
inspection, at all reasonable times, by the Board or its duly
authorized agents or employees.
G. A dead human body shall only undergo natural organic
reduction in this state at a natural organic reduction facility
licensed by the Board.
H. Any building to be used as a natural organic reduction
facility shall comply with all applicable local and state building
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 46

codes, zoning laws, ordinances, and environmental standards. A
natural organic reduction facility shall have on site:
1. A natural organic reduction system capable of reducing human
remains through natural organic reduction, including:
a. an identification system that maintains a secure chain
of custody and prevents commingling throughout the
process,
b. a vessel that can reach a minimum temperature of one
hundred thirty-one degrees Fahrenheit (131° F) for
seventy-two (72) consecutive hours to destroy
pathogens, and
c. a vessel monitoring system to ensure those temperature
thresholds are met;
2. A motorized mechanical device for processing the remains in
reduction; and
3. A refrigerated holding facility for the retention of dead
human bodies awaiting natural organic reduction.
I. The holding facility shall be secure from access by anyone
except the authorized personnel of the natural organic reduction
facility, preserve the dignity of the remains, and protect the
health and safety of the natural organic reduction facility
personnel. The room where human remains are prepared for natural
organic reduction shall be private and shall not have a general
passageway through it. All windows or other openings to the outside
shall be treated in a manner that prevents viewing into the room
where the deceased will be prepared for natural organic reduction.
A window for authorized family members of the deceased or such
family member or deceased person’s designees shall not constitute a
violation of this section. The location where human remains are
prepared for natural organic reduction shall:
1. Be secure from the entrance of unauthorized persons, at all
times. The following shall be considered authorized persons:
a. licensed funeral directors or natural organic
reduction facility operators,
b. registered apprentices,
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 47

c. public officials or representatives in the discharge
of their official duties,
d. the person or persons with the right to control the
disposition of the deceased, and
e. other individuals authorized by the authorizing agent
or if accompanied by an authorized person;
2. Be properly lit, ventilated with an exhaust fan, and
equipped with a functional sink with running hot and cold water;
3. Have nonporous flooring, such that a sanitary condition is
provided;
4. Have walls and ceiling covered with tile, by plaster or
sheetrock painted with washable paint, or other appropriate
material, such that a sanitary condition is provided; and
5. Have doors, walls, windows, and a ceiling constructed to
prevent odors from entering other parts of the building.
J. All licensed natural organic reduction facilities shall
develop, implement, and maintain an identification procedure whereby
dead human bodies can be identified from the time the natural
organic reduction facility accepts delivery of the body until the
reduced remains are released to an authorized party. After
reduction, an identifying disk, tab, or other permanent label shall
be placed within the reduced remains container or containers before
the remains are released from the natural organic reduction
facility. Each identification disk, tab, or label shall have a
number that shall be recorded on all paperwork regarding the
decedent. This procedure shall be designed to reasonably ensure
that the proper body is reduced and that the remains are returned to
the appropriate party.
K. The natural organic reduction facility shall:
1. Ensure that the material in the natural organic reduction
vessel naturally reaches and maintains a minimum temperature of one
hundred thirty-one degrees Fahrenheit (131° F) for a minimum of
seventy-two (72) consecutive hours during the process of reduction;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 48

2. Collect material samples for analysis that are
representative of each instance of reduction, using a sample method
such as those described in the US Composting Council Test Methods
for the Examination of Composting and Compost, Method 02.01-A
through 02.01-E;
3. Develop and use a reduction process in which the reduced
remains from the process do not exceed the following limits:
a. less than one-hundredths (.01) milligram of physical
contaminants per kilogram of dry weight,
b. fecal coliform less than one thousand (1,000) most
probable number per gram of total solids in dry
weight, or
c. salmonella less than three (3) most probable number
per four (4) grams of total solids in dry weight,
d. cadmium less than or equal to seven and one-tenths
(7.1) parts per million (ppm),
e. lead less than or equal to one hundred fifty (150)
ppm,
f. mercury less than or equal to five (5) ppm,
g. arsenic less than or equal to eleven (11) ppm, and
h. selenium less than or equal to eighteen (18) ppm;
4. Analyze, using a third-party laboratory, the natural organic
reduction facility’s material samples of reduced remains according
to the following schedule:
a. the reduction facility shall analyze each of the first
twenty instances of reduced remains for the limits set
forth in paragraph 3 of this subsection. If any of
the first twenty instances of reduced remains yield
results exceeding such limits, the natural organic
reduction facility shall analyze each additional
reduced remains until a total of twenty samples, not
including those from the original twenty reduced
remains that were analyzed pursuant to this
subparagraph, have yielded results within the limits
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 49

set forth in paragraph 3 of this subsection on initial
testing, and
b. after twenty material samples of reduced remains have
met the limits set forth in paragraph 3 of this
subsection, the natural organic reduction facility
shall analyze at least twenty-five percent (25%) of
the natural organic reduction facility’s monthly
reduced remains to ensure such remains are found to
meet such limits, not including any samples that
required reprocessing to meet such limits, and after
eighty material samples of the reduced remains are
found to meet the limits set forth in paragraph 3 of
this subsection, the reduction facility shall analyze
one randomly chosen instance of reduced remains each
month to ensure such remains meet the limits set forth
in paragraph 3 of this subsection. If fecal coliform
or salmonella in the tested reduced remains exceeds
the limit for that substance, the reduction facility
shall analyze subsequent instance of reduced remains
for fecal coliform and salmonella until ten total
material samples are found to meet such limits upon
initial testing, demonstrating the reduction process
was effectively corrected;
5. Comply with any testing requirements established by the
Oklahoma Funeral Board for content parameters in addition to those
set forth in paragraph 3 of this subsection;
6. Not release any naturally organically reduced remains that
exceed any parameters set forth in paragraph 3 of this subsection;
and
7. Prepare, maintain, and provide to the Oklahoma Funeral
Board, upon request, a report for each calendar year detailing the
reduction facility’s activities during the previous calendar year.
The report shall include the following information:
a. the name and address of the reduction facility,
b. the calendar year covered by the report,
c. the body intake log of reduced remains,
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 50

d. the results of any laboratory analyses of reduced
remains, and
e. any additional information required by the Board.
L. The natural organic reduction facility shall provide for the
removal and disposition of any accumulated residue from any
reduction vessel, mechanical processor, or other equipment used in
the reduction.
M. Every natural organic reduction facility shall create and
maintain on its premises or other business location in this state an
accurate record of every reduction. Such records shall be
maintained for a period of five (5) calendar years after the release
of the reduced remains. At the end of this period and subject to
any other laws requiring retention of records, the reduction
facility may destroy the records by any manner that protects the
privacy of the individuals identified. Each record shall include
the following information for each reduction:
1. The name of the person or funeral establishment delivering
the remains for reduction;
2. The name of the deceased and the identification number
assigned to the remains;
3. The date of delivery;
4. The names of the operator of the reduction process and the
mechanical processor operator;
5. The times and date that the remains were removed from the
reduction vessel;
6. The time, date, and manner of release of the reduced
remains;
7. The name and address of the person who signed the
authorization for reduction; and
8. All supporting documentation, including any transit or
medical examiner’s permit, and the authorization for the reduction.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 51

SECTION 12. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-329.1, as
amended by Section 12, Chapter 58, O.S.L. 2025 (63 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 1-329.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1-329.1. A. Until a permit for disposal has been
issued in accordance with this section, no dead human body whose
death occurred within the State of Oklahoma this state shall be
cremated, buried at sea, naturally organically reduced, or made
unavailable for further pathologic study by other recognized means
of destruction or dissolution of such remains.
B. When the person legally responsible for disposition of a
dead human body, whose death occurred or was pronounced within this
state, desires that the body be cremated, buried at sea, naturally
organically reduced, or made unavailable for further pathologic
study by other recognized means of destruction or dissolution of
such remains, that person shall complete an application-permit form
for such procedure provided by the Office of the Chief Medical
Examiner. The Office of the Chief Medical Examiner, in accordance
with the provisions of Section 948.1 of this title, shall charge a
fee for each cremation permit issued. The Chief Medical Examiner
shall be notified, as required in by the provisions of Section 938
of this title. He or she shall perform the required investigation
and shall issue a valid death certificate as required by Section 947
of this title and execute the permit in accordance with rules
established by the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner. In order
to be valid, each permit must shall contain an individual number
assigned to the particular permit by the Office of the Chief Medical
Examiner. A copy of the application-permit form and the original
death certificate shall be filed with the State Department of
Health. The original application-permit form shall be filed by the
funeral director with the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner.
Such filing shall occur or be postmarked within forty-eight (48)
hours of the death.
If death occurred or was pronounced outside the geographic
limits of the State of Oklahoma this state and the body is brought
into this state for such disposal, a transit permit or a permit for
removal, issued in accordance with the laws and regulations in force
where the death occurred shall authorize the transportation of the
body into or through this state and shall be accepted in lieu of a
certificate of death as required above. A valid permit issued for
disposal of such body in accordance with the laws in the
jurisdiction where the body died or death was pronounced shall be
authority for cremation or, burial at sea, or natural organic
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 52

reduction or to make the body otherwise unavailable for further
pathologic study by other recognized means of destruction or
dissolution of such remains.
SECTION 13. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 948.1, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 262, O.S.L. 2024 (63 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 948.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 948.1. A. The Board of Medicolegal Investigations may
establish a fee schedule for forensic services, permits and reports
rendered to members of the public and other agencies.
1. No fee schedule may be established or amended by the Board
except during a regular legislative session. The Board shall comply
with the Administrative Procedures Act for adoption of rules and
establishing or amending any such fee schedule.
2. Except as otherwise specified in this section, the Board
shall charge fees only within the following ranges:
a. permit for cremations or natural organic reductions
that occur within the state: Two Hundred Dollars
($200.00) to Two Hundred Seventy-five Dollars
($275.00),
b. forensic science service: One Hundred Dollars
($100.00) to Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00),
c. report copies: Ten Dollars ($10.00) for report of
investigation, including toxicology, and Twenty
Dollars ($20.00) for an autopsy report, including
toxicology,
d. x-rays: Fifteen Dollars ($15.00) each,
e. microscopic slides, Hematoxylin, and Eosin (H&E): Ten
Dollars ($10.00) each,
f. special stains: Fifteen Dollars ($15.00) each, and
g. photographs: Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) per compact
disc (CD) or other suitable digital storage media.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 53

3. Medical examiner permit certificates shall be required in
cases investigated solely for the purpose of issuing a permit for
transporting a body out of state.
4. The Board of Medicolegal Investigations shall charge a fee
for an investigation and issuance of an out-of-state transport
permit for human remains.
5. An out-of-state transport permit and cremation or natural
organic reduction permit shall both be required for bodies
containing body parts sent out of state or out of country, while
remaining body parts remain unused.
B. The Board shall base the fee schedule for forensic science
services, permits and reports upon reasonable costs of review,
investigation and forensic science service delivery; provided,
however, the fee schedule shall be within the ranges specified in
subsection A of this section. The Board shall continue a system of
basic and continuing educational service and training for all
personnel who render forensic science services in order to ensure
uniform statewide application of the rules of the Board. The Board
shall consider the reasonable costs associated with such training
and continuing education in setting the forensic science service
fees.
C. The Board may exempt by rule any agency or class of
individuals from the requirements of the fee schedule if the Board
determines that the fees would cause an unreasonable economic
hardship or would otherwise hinder or conflict with an agency’s
responsibilities.
D. All statutory fees currently in effect for permits or
forensic science services administered by the Chief Medical Examiner
and the Board of Medicolegal Investigations within the jurisdiction
of the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner shall remain in effect
until such time as the Board acts to implement new schedules
pursuant to the provisions of this section and Section 948 of this
title.
SECTION 14. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 54

Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 5th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3660 Page 55